Maryland, session 2025, HB0996.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 2F. PHENIBUT CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.
21–2F–01.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “PHENIBUT PRODUCT” MEANS A PRODUCT MARKETED FOR HUMAN
CONSUMPTION CONTAINING ANY BETA–PHENYL–GAMMA–AMINOBUTYRIC ACID
HCL.
(C) (1) “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON THAT:
(I) SELLS, PREPARES, OR MAINTAINS PHENIBUT PRODUCTS;
OR
– 1 –

Ch. 704 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ADVERTISES, REPRESENTS, OR HOLDS ITSELF OUT AS
SELLING, PREPARING, OR MAINTAINING PHENIBUT PRODUCTS.
(2) “RETAILER” INCLUDES A MANUFACTURER, WHOLESALER, STORE,
RESTAURANT, HOTEL, CATERING FACILITY, CAMP, BAKERY, DELICATESSEN,
SUPERMARKET, GROCERY STORE, CONVENIENCE STORE, GAS STATION, OR FOOD OR
DRINK COMPANY.
21–2F–02.
(A) (1) A RETAILER THAT PREPARES, DISTRIBUTES, SELLS, OR EXPOSES
FOR SALE A PHENIBUT PRODUCT SHALL DISCLOSE ON THE PRODUCT LABEL THE
FACTUAL BASIS ON WHICH ANY REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE PHENIBUT
PRODUCT ARE MADE.
(2) A RETAILER MAY NOT PREPARE, DISTRIBUTE, SELL, OR EXPOSE
FOR SALE A PHENIBUT PRODUCT THAT:
(I) DOES NOT COMPLY WITH THE DISCLOSURE REQUIREMENT
ESTABLISHED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION; OR
(II) HAS NOT BEEN RECOGNIZED AS A DIETARY INGREDIENT OR
APPROVED DRUG BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION.
(B) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A RETAILER
MAY NOT PREPARE, DISTRIBUTE, SELL, OR EXPOSE FOR SALE ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING:
(I) A PHENIBUT PRODUCT THAT IS ADULTERATED WITH A
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE OTHER THAN PHENIBUT;
(II) A PHENIBUT PRODUCT THAT IS CONTAMINATED WITH A
DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE OTHER THAN PHENIBUT; OR
(III) A PRODUCT CONTAINING PHENIBUT THAT DOES NOT
INCLUDE ON ITS PACKAGE OR LABEL THE AMOUNT OF
BETA–PHENYL–GAMMA–AMINOBUTYRIC ACID HCL CONTAINED IN THE PRODUCT.
(2) (I) FOR THE PURPOSE OF PARAGRAPH (1)(I) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PHENIBUT PRODUCT IS ADULTERATED WITH A DANGEROUS
SUBSTANCE OTHER THAN PHENIBUT IF:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 704
1. THE PHENIBUT PRODUCT IS MIXED OR PACKED WITH
A SUBSTANCE OTHER THAN PHENIBUT; AND
2. THAT SUBSTANCE AFFECTS THE QUALITY OR
STRENGTH OF THE PHENIBUT PRODUCT TO A DEGREE AS TO RENDER THE PHENIBUT
PRODUCT INJURIOUS TO A CONSUMER.
(II) FOR THE PURPOSE OF PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, A PHENIBUT PRODUCT IS CONTAMINATED WITH A DANGEROUS
SUBSTANCE OTHER THAN PHENIBUT IF THE PHENIBUT PRODUCT CONTAINS A
POISONOUS OR OTHERWISE DELETERIOUS INGREDIENT OTHER THAN PHENIBUT,
INCLUDING A DRUG THAT IS DESIGNATED AS A CONTROLLED DANGEROUS
SUBSTANCE UNDER TITLE 5 OF THE CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(C) A RETAILER MAY NOT DISTRIBUTE, SELL, OR EXPOSE FOR SALE A
PHENIBUT PRODUCT TO AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS.
(D) IN A PROSECUTION FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION, IT IS A DEFENSE
THAT THE DEFENDANT RELIED IN GOOD FAITH ON THE REPRESENTATIONS OF A
MANUFACTURER, PROCESSOR, PACKER, OR DISTRIBUTOR OF A PHENIBUT
PRODUCT.
(E) A RETAILER THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION IS
SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY NOT EXCEEDING:
(1) $1,000 FOR A FIRST VIOLATION; AND
(2) $2,000 FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION.
(F) A RETAILER THAT VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A)(2), (B), OR (C) OF THIS
SECTION IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE
NOT EXCEEDING $5,000, IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT MORE THAN 90 DAYS, OR BOTH.
(G) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER PENALTIES SPECIFIED IN THIS SECTION, A
RETAILER WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS LIABLE FOR ANY CIVIL DAMAGES
SUSTAINED BY THE INDIVIDUAL RESULTING FROM THE VIOLATION.
21–2F–03.
(A) A RETAILER MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE A
THERAPEUTIC BENEFIT OF PHENIBUT.
(B) A RETAILER MAY NOT DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ADVERTISE OR
MARKET PHENIBUT PRODUCTS TO MINORS.
– 3 –

Ch. 704 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR A
RETAILER TO USE ANY OF THE FOLLOWING IN THE ADVERTISING, PROMOTION,
PACKAGING, OR LABELING OF A PHENIBUT PRODUCT:
(1) A CARTOON;
(2) A SUPERHERO;
(3) A VIDEO GAME REFERENCE;
(4) AN IMAGE OF A FOOD PRODUCT PRIMARILY INTENDED FOR
MINORS;
(5) A TRADEMARK THAT IMITATES OR MIMICS THE TRADEMARK OF A
PRODUCT THAT HAS BEEN ADVERTISED OR MARKETED PRIMARILY TO MINORS;
(6) A SYMBOL OR CELEBRITY THAT IS PRIMARILY ASSOCIATED WITH
MINORS OR MEDIA PRIMARILY DIRECTED TO MINORS; AND
(7) AN IMAGE OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO APPEARS TO BE UNDER THE
AGE OF 27 YEARS.
(D) IT IS A VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR A
RETAILER TO ADVERTISE OR PROMOTE A PHENIBUT PRODUCT:
(1) IN A NEWSPAPER, A MAGAZINE, A PERIODICAL, OR ANY OTHER
PUBLICATION FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE
15% OR MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND
RELIABLE SURVEY EVIDENCE;
(2) AT A CONCERT, A STADIUM, A SPORTING EVENT, OR ANY OTHER
PUBLIC EVENT FOR WHICH INDIVIDUALS UNDER THE AGE OF 21 YEARS CONSTITUTE
15% OR MORE OF THE TOTAL AUDIENCE, AS MEASURED BY COMPETENT AND
RELIABLE SURVEY EVIDENCE; OR
(3) ON AN OUTDOOR BILLBOARD OR SIGN BOARD THAT IS WITHIN 500
FEET OF A SCHOOL.
21–2F–04.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 704
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31,
2026, the Maryland Department of Health, in collaboration with the Maryland Hospital
Association, shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, on the number of adverse health events observed in individuals after
the use of phenibut.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –